Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-205
Supervisor districts; how numbered.

When the county has been divided as provided in section 23-204, the county attorney, county clerk and county treasurer shall at once proceed to number such districts from one to seven and in case of a city district as contemplated in said section, it shall give such city district two numbers, one odd and one even.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 5, p. 132;

R.S.1913, § 991;

C.S.1922, § 891;

C.S.1929, § 26-205;

R.S.1943, § 23-205;

Laws 1947, c. 64, § 3, p. 211;

Laws 1979, LB 331, § 5.